Utah statutes.
53-3-405.   Authority to drive commercial motor vehicle in Utah.

(1)  A person who holds or is required to hold a CDL may drive a commercial motor vehicle in this state if:

(a)  the person has a CDL issued by any state in accordance with the minimum federal standards for the issuance of commercial motor vehicle driver licenses;

(b)  the person's license is not denied, suspended, revoked, or canceled;

(c) the person is not disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle; and

(d)  the person has a valid medical certification status.

(2)  This section supersedes any provision to the contrary.



Amended by Chapter 190, 2011 General Session

